Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2708
Tractor model tests results; improper use; penalty.

No person shall use the results of such tests in such manner as would cause it to appear that the University of Nebraska or the department intended to recommend the use of any given tractor model in preference to any other model. For any violation of this section the department may suspend any permit issued to that person or deny such person the right of obtaining future permits to sell tractors in the state.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 43, p. 1397;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-343;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 8, p. 1489;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 11.